Washington statutes.
RCW 41.40.680

Application for and effective date of retirement allowances.

Any member or beneficiary eligible to receive a retirement allowance under the provisions of RCW 41.40.630, 41.40.670, or 41.40.700 shall be eligible to commence receiving a retirement allowance after having filed written application with the department.

(1) Retirement allowances paid to members under the provisions of RCW 41.40.630 shall accrue from the first day of the calendar month immediately following such member's separation from employment.

(2) Retirement allowances paid to vested members no longer in service, but qualifying for such an allowance pursuant to RCW 41.40.630, shall accrue from the first day of the calendar month immediately following such qualification.

(3) Disability allowances paid to disabled members under the provisions of RCW 41.40.670 shall accrue from the first day of the calendar month immediately following such member's separation from employment for disability.

(4) Retirement allowances paid as death benefits under the provisions of RCW 41.40.700 shall accrue from the first day of the calendar month immediately following the member's death.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 295 s 9.]

NOTES:

Legislative direction and placement—Section headings—1977 ex.s. c 295: See notes following RCW 41.40.610.